Utah statutes.
57-8-7.2.   Scope -- Designation of certain areas.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, this section applies to a
unit if the declaration designates a wall, floor, or ceiling as a boundary of
the unit.
(2) (a)  The following are part of a unit:
(i)  lath;
(ii)  furring;
(iii)  wallboard;
(iv)  plasterboard;
(v)  plaster;
(vi)  paneling;
(vii)  tiles;
(viii)  wallpaper;
(ix)  paint;
(x)  finished flooring; and
(xi)  any other material constituting part of the finished surface of a wall,
floor, or ceiling.
(b)  Any portion of a wall, floor, or ceiling not listed in Subsection (2)(a)
is part of the common areas and facilities.
(3)  If a chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or
any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated
boundaries of a unit:
(a)  any portion of an item described in this Subsection (3) serving only that
unit is part of the limited common areas and facilities; and
(b)  any portion of an item described in this Subsection (3) is part of the
common areas and facilities if the item serves:
(i)  more than one unit; or
(ii)  any portion of the common areas and facilities.
(4)  Subject to Subsection (3), the following within the boundaries of a unit
are part of the unit:
(a)  spaces;
(b)  interior partitions; and
(c)  other fixtures and improvements.
(5)  The following, if designated to serve a single unit but located outside
the unit's boundaries, are limited common areas and facilities allocated
exclusively to a unit:
(a)  a shutter;
(b)  an awning;
(c)  a window box;
(d)  a doorstep;
(e)  a stoop;
(f)  a porch;
(g)  a balcony;
(h)  a patio;
(i)  an exterior door;
(j)  an exterior window; and
(k)  any other fixture.
